California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
  ARTICLE 5.4. Runaway Youth and Families in Crisis Project [1787. - 1789.]

1787.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) A tremendous percentage of juveniles who commit status offenses including, but not limited to, running away, school truancy and incorrigibility, ultimately enter the juvenile justice system for subsequently engaging in delinquent, otherwise criminal behavior.

(b) In 1990, it was estimated that 48,629 youths ran away from their homes in California.

(c) In 1989, 776 runaway youths served by 33 nonprofit youth-runaway shelters in California, surveyed during a one-month period, identified one or more of the following as a problem:(1) Family crisis 73%(2) School problems 63%(3) Victims of crime/abuse 57%(4) Homeless/runaway 55%(5) Substance abuse 43%(6) Delinquent behavior 26%(7) Other 9%(d) It is estimated that 43 emergency shelters presently serve runaway youths as well as homeless youths and adults in California.

(e) It is estimated that 10 transitional living facilities are operated
 presently in California to provide youths with independent living skills, employment skills, and home responsibilities.

(f) It is conservatively projected that by the year 2000 there will be a deficit of 1,222 emergency shelter beds and 930 long-term beds statewide.

(g) Resources for runaway, homeless, and at-risk youth and their families are severely inadequate to meet their needs.

(h) The Counties of Fresno, Sacramento, San Bernardino, and Solano either (1) do not provide temporary or long-term shelter services or family crises services to runaway, homeless, and nonrunaway youth, or (2) do provide such services but at levels which substantially fail to meet the need.

The purpose of this chapter, therefore, is to establish three-year pilot projects in San Joaquin Central
 Valley, in the northern region of California, and in the southern region of California, whereby each project will provide temporary shelter services, transitional living shelter services, and low-cost family crisis resolution services based on a sliding fee scale to runaway youth, nonrunaway youth, and their working families. It is the intent of this chapter that services will be provided to prevent at-risk youth from engaging in delinquent and criminal behavior and to reduce the numbers of at-risk families from engaging in neglectful, abusive, and criminal behavior.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1790 (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1065) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 195.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.

Each Runaway Youth and Families in Crisis Project established under this article shall provide services which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Temporary shelter and related services to runaway youth. The services shall include:

(1) Food and access to overnight shelter for no more than 14 days.

(2) Counseling and referrals to services which
 address immediate emotional needs or problems.

(3) Screening for basic health needs and referral to public and private health providers for health care. Shelters that are not equipped to house a youth with substance abuse problems shall refer that youth to an appropriate clinic or facility. The shelter shall monitor the youth’s progress and assist the youth with services upon his or her release from the substance abuse facility.

(4) Long-term planning so that the youth may be returned to the home of the parent or guardian under conditions which favor long-term reunification with the family, or so the youth can be suitably placed in a situation outside of the parental or guardian home when such reunification is not possible.

(5) Outreach services and activities to locate runaway youth and to link them with project
 services.

(b) Family crisis resolution services to runaway and nonrunaway youth and their families which shall include:

(1) Parent training.

(2) Family counseling.

(3) Services designed to reunify youth and their families.

(4) Referral to other services offered in the community by public and private agencies.

(5) Long-term planning so that the youth may be returned to the home of the parent or guardian under conditions which favor long-term reunification with the family, or so the youth can be suitably placed in a situation outside of the parental or guardian home when such reunification is not possible.

(6) Followup services to ensure that the return to the parent or guardian or the placement outside of the parental or guardian home is stable.

(7) Outreach services and activities to locate runaway and nonrunaway youth and to link them with project services.

(c) Transitional living services shall include:

(1) Long-term shelter.

(2) Independent living skill services.

(3) Preemployment and employment skills training.

(4) Home responsibilities training.

(d) Where appropriate and necessary, some of the
 services identified under this section must also be provided in the local community and in the home of project clients. Projects shall notify parents that their children are staying at a project site consistent with state and federal parent notification requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.

(a) A Runaway Youth and Families in Crisis Project shall be established in one or more counties in the San Joaquin Central Valley, in one or more counties in the northern region of California, and in one or more counties in the southern region of California. Each project may have one central location, or more than one site, in order to effectively serve the target population.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall prepare and disseminate a request for proposals to prospective grantees under this chapter within four months after this chapter has been approved and enacted by the Legislature. The Office of Emergency Services shall enter into grant award agreements for a period of no less
 than three years, and the operation of projects shall begin no later than four months after grant award agreements are entered into between the agency and the grantee. Grants shall be awarded based on the quality of the proposal, the documented need for services in regard to runaway youth, and to organizations, as specified in subdivision (d) of this section, in localities that receive a disproportionately low share of existing federal and state support for youth shelter programs.

(c) The Office of Emergency Services shall require applicants to identify, in their applications, measurable outcomes by which the agency will measure the success of the applicant’s project. These measurable outcomes shall include, but not be limited to, the number of clients served and the percentage of clients who are successfully returned to the
 home of a parent or guardian or to an alternate living condition when reunification is not possible.

(d) Only private, nonprofit organizations shall be eligible to apply for funds under this chapter to operate a Runaway Youth and Families in Crisis Project, and these organizations shall be required to annually contribute a local match of at least 15 percent in cash or in-kind contribution to the project during the term of the grant award agreement. Preference shall be given to organizations that demonstrate a record of providing effective services to runaway youth or families in crisis for at least three years, successfully operating a youth shelter for runaway and homeless youth, or successfully operating a transitional living facility for runaway and homeless youth who do not receive transitional living services through the juvenile justice
 system. Additional weight shall also be given to those organizations that demonstrate a history of collaborating with other agencies and individuals in providing such services. Priority shall be given to organizations with existing facilities. Preference shall also be given to organizations that demonstrate the ability to progressively decrease their reliance on resources provided under this chapter and to operate this project beyond the period that the organization receives funds under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 535.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Crime and Delinquency Prevention [1790. - 1799.]

1790.

The purpose of this article is to reduce crime and delinquency by assisting the development, establishment and operation of comprehensive public and private community based programs for crime and delinquency prevention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1791.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall exercise leadership on behalf of the state in order to accomplish the purpose of this article. All state agencies shall cooperate with the Department of the Youth Authority in order to bring about a statewide program for the reduction and prevention of crime and delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1792.

The Director of the Youth Authority may provide funds for financial support, in amounts determined by him, from funds available for such purposes, to public or private agencies engaging in crime and delinquency prevention programs. No public or private organization may receive such support unless it complies with the standards developed pursuant to Section 1793.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1792.1.

The director shall make annual allocations from funds made available to him for such purposes for administrative expenses to county delinquency prevention commissions established pursuant to Sections 233 and 235 not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per year for each commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

1792.2.

The director may make additional matching allocations from funds available to him for such purposes, in amounts determined by him, to county delinquency prevention commissions for the development and operation of delinquency prevention projects or programs administered and operated by local governmental or nongovernmental organizations under the general supervision of the county delinquency prevention commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.

The Director of the Youth Authority shall develop standards for the operation of programs funded under Sections 1792, 1792.1 and 1792.2. He shall seek advice from interested citizens, appropriate representatives of public and private agencies and youth groups in developing such standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.

Application for funds under Sections 1792, 1792.1, and 1792.2 shall be made to the Director of the Youth Authority in the manner and form prescribed by the department. The department shall prescribe the amounts, time, and manner of payments of assistance if granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.

To help communities develop effective local programs, the Director of the Youth Authority may, upon request, provide technical assistance to judges, probation officers, law enforcement officials, school administrators, welfare administrators, and other public and private organizations, and citizen groups. The assistance may include studies and surveys to identify problems, development of written instructional or information materials, preparation of policy statements and procedural guides, field consultation with appropriate persons in the community, and other assistance as appears appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1796.

The Director of the Youth Authority may from funds available to him for such purposes provide funds for demonstration or experimental projects designed to test the validity of new methods or strategies in delinquency prevention programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.

The director may assist in the establishment of public committees having as their object the prevention or decrease of crime and delinquency among youth, and the director may participate in the work of any such existing or established committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.

As of July 1, 2005, the State Commission on Juvenile Justice, Crime and Delinquency Prevention is abolished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 89.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.

The director may, with the approval of the Director of General Services, enter into contracts with the federal government, other state governments, counties, cities, private foundations, private organizations, or any other group to accomplish the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Extended Detention of Dangerous Persons [1800. - 1803.]

1800.

(a) Whenever the Division of Juvenile Facilities determines that the discharge of a person from the control of the division at the time required by Section 1766, 1769, 1770, or 1771, as applicable, would be physically dangerous to the public because of the person’s mental or physical deficiency, disorder, or abnormality that causes the person to have serious difficulty controlling his or her dangerous behavior, the division, through the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice, shall request the prosecuting attorney to petition the committing court for an order directing that the person remain subject to the control of the division beyond that time. The petition shall be filed at least 90 days before the time of discharge otherwise required.
 The petition shall be accompanied by a written statement of the facts upon which the division bases its opinion that discharge from control of the division at the time stated would be physically dangerous to the public, but the petition may not be dismissed and an order may not be denied merely because of technical defects in the application.

(b) The prosecuting attorney shall promptly notify the Division of Juvenile Facilities of a decision not to file a petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 111.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1800.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Parole Hearings may request the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice to review any case in which the Division of Juvenile Facilities has not made a request to the prosecuting attorney pursuant to Section 1800 and the board finds that the ward would be physically dangerous to the public because of the ward’s mental or physical deficiency, disorder, or abnormality that causes the person to have serious difficulty controlling his or her dangerous behavior. Upon the board’s request, a mental health professional designated by the director shall review the case and thereafter may affirm the finding or order additional assessment of the ward. If, after review, the mental health designee affirms the initial
 finding, concludes that a subsequent assessment does not demonstrate that a ward is subject to extended detention pursuant to Section 1800, or fails to respond to a request from the board within the timeframe mandated by this section, the board thereafter may request the prosecuting attorney to petition the committing court for an order directing that the person remain subject to the control of the division pursuant to Section 1800 if the board continues to find that the ward would be physically dangerous to the public because of the ward’s mental or physical deficiency, disorder, or abnormality that causes the person to have serious difficulty controlling his or her dangerous behavior. The board’s request to the prosecuting attorney shall be accompanied by a copy of the ward’s file and any documentation upon which the board bases its opinion, and shall include any documentation of the division’s review and recommendations made pursuant to this section. Any request for review pursuant to this section shall
 be submitted to the director not less than 120 days before the date of final discharge, and the review shall be completed and transmitted to the board not more than 15 days after the request has been received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 112.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.

(a) If a petition is filed with the court for an order as provided in Section 1800 and, upon review, the court determines that the petition, on its face, supports a finding of probable cause, the court shall order that a hearing be held pursuant to subdivision (b). The court shall notify the person whose liberty is involved and, if the person is a minor, his or her parent or guardian (if that person can be reached, and, if not, the court shall appoint a person to act in the place of the parent or guardian) of the hearing, and shall afford the person an opportunity to appear at the hearing with the aid of counsel and the right to cross-examine experts or other witnesses upon whose information, opinion, or testimony the petition is based. The court shall inform the person named in the petition of his or her right of process to compel attendance of relevant witnesses and the production of relevant evidence. When the person is unable to provide his or her own counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to represent him or her.

The probable cause hearing shall be held within 10 calendar days after the date the order is issued pursuant to this subdivision unless the person named in the petition waives this time.

(b) At the probable cause hearing, the court shall receive evidence and determine whether there is probable cause to believe that discharge of the person would be physically dangerous to the public because of his or her mental or physical deficiency, disorder, or abnormality which causes the person to have serious difficulty controlling his or her dangerous behavior. If the court determines there is not probable cause, the court shall dismiss the petition and the person shall be discharged from the control of the authority at the time required by Section 1766, 1769, 1770, 1770.1, or 1771, as applicable. If the court determines there is probable cause, the court shall order that a trial be conducted to determine whether the person is physically dangerous to the public because of his or her mental or physical deficiency, disorder, or abnormality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 110, Sec. 3.   Effective July 21, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.5.

If a trial is ordered pursuant to Section 1801, the trial shall be by jury unless the right to a jury trial is personally waived by the person, after he or she has been fully advised of the constitutional rights being waived, and by the prosecuting attorney, in which case trial shall be by the court. If the jury is not waived, the court shall cause a jury to be summoned and to be in attendance at a date stated, not less than four days nor more than 30 days from the date of the order for trial, unless the person named in the petition waives time. The court shall submit to the jury, or, at a court trial, the court shall answer, the question: Is the person physically dangerous to the public because of his or her mental or physical deficiency, disorder, or abnormality which causes the person to have serious difficulty controlling his or her dangerous behavior? The court’s previous order entered pursuant to Section 1801 shall not be read to the jury, nor alluded to in the trial. The person shall be entitled to all rights guaranteed under the federal and state constitutions in criminal proceedings. A unanimous jury verdict shall be required in any jury trial. As to either a court or a jury trial, the standard of proof shall be that of proof beyond a reasonable doubt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 110, Sec. 4.   Effective July 21, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.6.

When the venue of a proceeding under this chapter is changed, costs of the proceeding are chargeable as provided in Section 1037 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 235, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.

When an order for continued detention is made as provided in Section 1801, the control of the authority over the person shall continue, subject to the provisions of this chapter, but, unless the person is previously discharged as provided in Section 1766, the authority shall, within two years after the date of that order in the case of persons committed by the juvenile court, or within two years after the date of that order in the case of persons committed after conviction in criminal proceedings, file a new application for continued detention in accordance with the provisions of Section 1800 if continued detention is deemed necessary. These applications may be repeated at intervals as often as in the opinion of the authority may be necessary for the protection of the public, except that the department shall have the power, in order to protect other persons in the custody of the department to transfer the custody of any person over 21 years of age to the Director of Corrections for placement in the appropriate institution.

Each person shall be discharged from the control of the authority at the termination of the period stated in this section unless the authority has filed a new application and the court has made a new order for continued detention as provided above in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 47.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.

An order of the committing court made pursuant to this article is appealable by the person whose liberty is involved in the same manner as a judgment in a criminal case. The appellate court may affirm the order of the lower court, or modify it, or reverse it and order the appellant to be discharged. Pending appeal, the appellant shall remain under the control of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1693.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. County Justice System Subvention Program [1805. - 1806.]

1805.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to protect society from crime and delinquency by helping counties maintain and improve local correctional systems and crime and delinquency prevention programs by encouraging the continued availability of county operated juvenile correctional facilities, and by providing funding for services required or authorized by Chapter 1071 of the Statutes of 1976. It is also the intent of the Legislature to reduce the administrative costs of justice system programs, to provide maximum flexibility in meeting local needs in the delivery of services, and to enhance justice system planning and coordination efforts at the state and local levels.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 288, Sec. 5.   Effective July 15, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.

(a) From any state moneys made available to it for the program, commencing with fiscal year 1983–84, the Department of the Youth Authority shall provide funds to counties for the following purposes: 

(1) To develop and maintain local programs for minors and adults who are eligible for commitment to the Department of Corrections or to the Department of the Youth Authority or who are considered to be at a high risk of becoming eligible for commitment. 

(2) To maintain local programs for minors who have been found to be persons described by Section 602 and who are committed to a juvenile hall or to a juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp established pursuant to Sections 850 and 880. 

(3) To develop and maintain programs to prevent crime and delinquency by persons who are not wards of the juvenile court or under court ordered probation supervision or serving a sentence as a result of a conviction in a court of criminal jurisdiction. 

(4) To maintain programs or services required or authorized by Chapter 1071 of the Statutes of 1976. 

(5) To provide funding for necessary county administrative expenses for the county justice system block grant program. 

(b) In utilizing funds for the purposes set forth in subdivision (a), counties shall give primary consideration to programs which are local alternatives to the commitment of minors and adults to the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority. 

(c) Funds granted to counties under this article shall not be used for capital construction; for travel outside of the State of California; for law enforcement investigation or apprehension purposes; for the expense of prosecution or defense, except to the extent required by Chapter 1071 of the Statutes of 1976; or for the costs of confinement or detention in a jail, juvenile hall, or other secure lockup prior to sentencing or disposition by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 8.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Juvenile Offender Local Prevention and Corrections Act [1820. - 1820.55.]

1820.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Juvenile Offender Local Prevention and Corrections Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.05.

For purposes of this article, “partnership funds” means the state’s share of funding for county juvenile ranches, camps, and forestry camps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.1.

Partnership funds shall be used only for the purpose of confinement, discipline, and treatment of juvenile offenders in county juvenile ranches, camps, or forestry camps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.15.

(a) The Department of the Youth Authority shall establish and implement the Juvenile Offender Local Prevention and Corrections Program.

(b) The purpose of the program required by subdivision (a) shall be to coordinate state and local efforts to confine, discipline, treat, and prevent juvenile offenders and to provide partnership funding for county juvenile ranches, camps, and forestry camps established pursuant to Section 880.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.2.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall, in the implementation of this article, do all of the following:

(a) Determine county eligibility for partnership funding.

(b) Distribute partnership funds to qualified counties quarterly based on the average daily population of the county’s juvenile ranches, camps, and forestry camps for the previous fiscal quarter.

(c) Monitor county compliance with eligibility requirements.

(d) Provide technical assistance to counties to prevent unnecessary commitments to the Department of the Youth Authority and to expand the capacity of the counties to confine, discipline, and treat juvenile offenders in a manner consistent with public safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.25.

A county may apply to receive partnership funds under this article by submitting an application to the department in a manner and at a time determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.3.

A county shall be eligible for the receipt of partnership funds under this article only if the county meets all of the following conditions:

(a) The county administers one or more juvenile ranches, camps, or forestry camps.

(b) The county’s juvenile ranches, camps, or forestry camps possess, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A residential treatment program.

(2) A structured and disciplined program for each resident.

(3) Individual counseling.

(4) Physical fitness training.

(5) Social alternatives to gangs, drugs, and alcohol, including gang intervention programs where appropriate.

(6) Work experience and vocational training through work crew assignments.

(7) Access to certified, accredited courses in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, computer laboratories, and basic reading and writing skills, with an emphasis on remedial education.

(8) Coordination with parents or guardians in preparation for family reunification.

However, the Director of Youth Authority, upon request of a county, may waive services required in paragraphs (3), (6), and (7), as appropriate, if the provision of those services is not feasible or necessary, as demonstrated by the county.

(c) The county program does all of the following:

(1) It provides a positive reinforcing environment that redirects physical, social, and emotional energies into constructive channels.

(2) It emphasizes responsibility for one’s actions.

(3) It employs goal-setting methods to maximize self-discipline, self-confidence, and sense of pride.

(d) The county maintains at least the same number of beds as were available on June 30, 1993. The director, upon request of a county, may waive this requirement if the county demonstrates it is unable to comply due to unforeseen circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature that counties that do not operate juvenile camps or ranches, but instead contract for beds with counties that do, shall benefit from partnership funding via reduced contract costs, based on the host county’s cost of providing the bed, excluding the state contribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.45.

(a) (1) The Department of the Youth Authority shall work with counties to develop boot camp programs, either separately or as part of existing ranches, camps, and forestry camps.

(2) Boot camps shall provide the same services as juvenile ranches, camps, and forestry camps but shall be conducted in a highly structured, military style environment.

(3) Boot camps shall include greater emphasis on physical conditioning, athletics, and team building than county juvenile ranches, camps, or forestry camps.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of the Youth Authority and participating counties shall develop a comprehensive boot camp program that incorporates the relevant design features of the federal juvenile boot camp pilot project. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the comprehensive boot camp program should include diagnostic assessment, community-based aftercare, and accountability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.47.

In order to develop, establish, and operate residential and nonresidential boot camp and similar programs for young, first-time offenders and nonserious and nonviolent offenders, a county may contract with the Military Department for the provision of the following services:

(a) Program planning assistance for counties contemplating the development of residential and nonresidential boot camp and similar programs.

(b) Training of personnel for residential and nonresidential boot camp and similar programs.

(c) Technical assistance for existing boot camp and similar programs.

(d) Assistance in establishing cooperative innovative military projects and career training (IMPACT) programs.

A county that contracts with the Military Department for any of these services shall be reimbursed for its costs to the extent that funds are made available in the annual Budget Act for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 72, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, commencing with the 1994–95 fiscal year, this article shall be funded by the federal government, the state, and eligible counties.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount of funding from each source identified in paragraph (1) shall be determined in the Budget Act of 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.55.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall adopt emergency regulations for implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Work Furloughs [1830. - 1835.]

1830.

The Director of the Youth Authority may participate in a local work furlough program established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1208 of the Penal Code, or conduct or discontinue a work furlough rehabilitation program, in accordance with the provisions of this article, for appropriate classes of wards at one or more Youth Authority institutions. He or she may designate any officer or employee of the department to be the Youth Authority work furlough administrator and may assign personnel to assist the administrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 48.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1831.

When a person is committed to a facility under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority, the Youth Authority work furlough administrator may, if he concludes that such person is a fit subject therefor, direct that such person be permitted to continue in his regular employment, if that is compatible with the requirements of Section 1833, or may authorize the person to secure employment for himself in the county, unless the court at the time of commitment has ordered that such person not be granted work furloughs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

1832.

If the Youth Authority work furlough administrator so directs that the ward be permitted to continue in his regular employment, the administrator shall arrange for a continuation of such employment so far as possible without interruption. If the ward does not have regular employment, and the administrator has authorized the ward to secure employment for himself, the ward may do so, and the administrator may assist him in doing so. Any employment so secured must be suitable for the ward. Such employment must be at a wage at least as high as the prevailing wage for similar work in the area where the work is performed and in accordance with the prevailing working conditions in such area. In no event may any such employment be permitted where there is a labor dispute in the establishment in which the ward is, or is to be, employed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

1833.

Whenever the ward is not employed and between the hours or periods of employment, he shall be confined in a detention facility unless the court or administrator directs otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.

The earnings of the ward shall be collected by the Youth Authority work furlough administrator, and it shall be the duty of the ward’s employer to transmit such wages to the administrator at the latter’s request. Earnings levied upon pursuant to writ of execution or in other lawful manner shall not be transmitted to the administrator. If the administrator has requested transmittal of earnings prior to levy, such request shall have priority. When an employer transmits such earnings to the administrator pursuant to this section he shall have no liability to the ward for such earnings. From such earnings the administrator shall pay the ward’s board and personal expenses, both inside and outside the detention facility, and shall deduct so much of the costs of administration of this article as is allocable to such ward. If sufficient funds are available after making the foregoing payments, the administrator may, with the consent of the ward, pay, in whole or in part, the preexisting debts of the ward. Any balance shall be retained until the ward’s discharge and thereupon shall be paid to him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

1835.

In the event the ward violates the conditions laid down for his conduct, custody, or employment, the Youth Authority work furlough administrator may order termination of work furloughs for such minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Youth Correctional Centers [1850. - 1861.]

1850.

The purpose of this article is to protect society more effectively by providing a system of flexible constraints and controls that utilize short-term confinement for selected youthful offenders, followed by intensive probation supervision. To this end it is the intent of the Legislature that this article be liberally interpreted in conformity with its declared purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.

In order to provide appropriate facilities for the rehabilitative treatment of young offenders who otherwise may be committed to the Department of the Youth Authority or the Department of Corrections, and in order to provide this treatment in the community where family and personal relationships can be strengthened rather than severed, and in order to provide a range of alternative dispositions to the courts before whom young offenders appear, and in order to provide opportunities for private citizens to contribute actively to the rehabilitation of offenders in their own neighborhood, youth correctional centers may be established by ordinance by boards of supervisors of any county, as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1852.

Complete operation and authority for administration of the youth correctional center shall be vested in the county. The board of supervisors shall place responsibility for internal management with the chief probation officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.

Juvenile court wards and criminal offenders eligible for probation may be committed to youth correctional centers as a condition of probation, provided they come within all of the following descriptions:

(1) Who have not, at the time of commitment, reached the age of 25 years.

(2) Who have not been found guilty of a capital offense in a criminal proceeding.

(3) Who have been declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602, Welfare and Institutions Code, or who have been found guilty in a criminal proceeding of one or more public offenses where the maximum term of confinement is not less than six months if the sentences run consecutively.
